Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1238.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [136A.104] REQUIRED DISCLOSURES. new text end new text begin (a) An institution eligible for state student aid under section 136A.103 must develop information concerning the potential career opportunities in each curriculum or major field of study leading to a four-year degree that is offered. The information must include but not be limited to the potential job market in this state in the major field or curriculum after graduation, the median income or an income range for jobs in the major field or curriculum in this state, and whether an advanced degree in the major field or curriculum is required to obtain employment in that field. new text end new text begin (b) The information under paragraph (a) must be posted on the institution's website. A link to the information, together with a brief description of the type of information available, must be posted on the website of each institution eligible for state student aid under section 136A.103 that offers four-year degrees. The institution is not required to publish the information developed in school catalogs, but school catalogs must include, in a prominent location, the website address for the information and a brief description of the type of information that is available. new text end